District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1813.06

Violations.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 357, ch. 258, art. I, title XIII, § 6
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-124, title IV, § 401(e), 23 DCR 8749
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(c), 47 DCR 5799
1981 Ed., § 47-1813.6.
1973 Ed., § 47-1589e.